Montana, session 2025, HB727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 33-16-1020, MCA, is amended to read:
"33-16-1020. Competitive market -- hearing. (1) Except as annually measured by the commissioner
in subsection (4), A a competitive market is presumed to exist unless the commissioner, after hearing, issues
an order stating that a reasonable degree of competition does not exist in the market. The order may not expire
later than 1 year after issuance.
(2) (a) In determining whether a reasonable degree of competition exists, the commissioner shall
consider the following factors:
(a)(i) the number of insurers actively engaged in providing coverage;
(b)(ii) market shares and changes in market shares;
(c)(iii) ease of entry into the market;
(d)(iv) market concentration among plan No. 2 insurers and plan No. 3, the state fund, as measured
by the Herfindahl-Hirschman index;
(e)(v) whether long-term profitability for insurers in the market is unreasonably high in relation to the
risks being insured;
(f)(vi) whether long-term profitability for insurers in the market is reasonable in relation to industries of
comparable business risks; and
(g)(vii) generally accepted and relevant tests relating to competitive market structure, market
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 727

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 727.1
performance, and market conduct.
(b) As used in subsection (2)(a)(i), the term "actively engaged" means a positive measurable effect
on the Herfindahl-Hirschman index as determined using the national association of insurance commissioners'
annual market share report pertaining to direct premiums earned.
(3) The workers' compensation insurance market may not be determined to be noncompetitive if
the market concentration of the 50 largest insurers writing or actively engaged in workers' compensation
insurance under plan No. 2 and plan No. 3, the state fund, satisfied the U.S. department of justice merger
guidelines for an unconcentrated market.
(4) (a)The commissioner shall annually measure market concentration among plan No. 2 and plan
No. 3, the state fund, using the Herfindahl-Hirschman index. If the Herfindahl-Hirschman index is over 1,800,
the market is presumed to not have a reasonable degree of competition. The commissioner shall hold a public
hearing to confirm that a competitive market does not exist in the state.
(b) If the commissioner finds that a competitive market does not exist after conducting a hearing
under subsection (4)(a), the commissioner shall order the following corrective measures to improve market
concentration:
(i) promote new insurers to the market;
(ii) limit large mergers of insurers;
(iii) promote consumer education relating to options for insurance; and
(iv) prohibit or limit by at least 50% the premium written by producer agencies to the monopoly
carrier until the market is of a reasonable competitive measure; and
(v) immediately implement regulations that actively promote competition and discourage practices
that contribute to market concentration.
(c) The list of corrective measures in subsection (4)(b) is not an exhaustive list of corrective
measures to improve market concentration. The commissioner may add other courses of action to the list.
(4)(5) The commissioner's determinations must be made on the basis of findings of fact and
conclusions of law. Upon the commissioner taking action as provided in subsection (4)(b), the commissioner
shall provide notice to all customers, insurers, and producers who participate in workers' compensation in the
state."
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 727

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 727.1
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 727